District of Columbia statutes.
10-1904

Transfer of real property pursuant to Legally Binding Agreement.

Notwithstanding Chapter 8 of this title [§ 10-801 et seq.], the Mayor is authorized to transfer the subject real property to the applicable homeless-assistance provider in accordance with the terms of the applicable Legally Binding Agreement.

History

Oct. 16, 2012, D.C. Law 19-175, § 5, 59 DCR 9106

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 5 of the Walter Reed Army Medical Center Base Realignment and Closure Homeless Assistance Submission Congressional Review Emergency Approval Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-528, November 2, 2012, 59 DCR 13325), applicable as of October 16, 2012.